Massachusetts, session 194th, H3335.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 7 of Chapter 66 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end 
thereto the following sentence: All records in the custody of the state secretary accessioned from 
state institutions for people with intellectual or developmental disabilities or mental health 
conditions in the commonwealth shall be open to public inspection and available for copying 
after the expiration of seventy-five years from creation of the record.